dictsource/ipa_rules
.replace
pʰ  ph
tʰ  th
ʈ  t.
ʈʰ  t.h
ɖ  d.
ɳ  n.
ɲ  n^
t͡s  ts
t͡sʰ  tsh
d͡z  dz
t͡ʂ  ts.
t͡ʂʰ  ts.h
d͡ʐ  dz.
ʂ  s.
ʐ  z.
t͡ɕ  tS;
t͡ɕʰ  tS;h
d͡ʑ  dZ;
ɕ  S;
ʑ  Z;
kʰ  kh
ŋ  N
ʔ  ?
ɦ  h.
O  U
æ  &
ɐ  &"
ɑ  A
ɔ  O
ə  @
ɛ  E
ɤ  o-
ɨ  i"
æi  &i
ɐi  &"i
ɑi  Ai
ɑu  Au
əi  @i
ɛi  Ei
ɛu  Eu
ɤi  o-i
ɨu  i"u
ɨi  i"i
j̈  j"
ẅ  w"
ɥ  y
ɻ  r.
ɻj  r.j
ɻw  r.w
ɻɥ  r.y

.group p
       p    p

.group b
       b    b

.group m
       m    m

.group t
       t    t

.group d
       d    d

.group n
       n    n

.group l
       l    l

.group s
       s    s

.group z
       z    z

.group k
       k    k

.group g
       g    g

.group j
       j    j

.group h
       h    h

.group I
       I    I

.group a
       a    a
       ai   ai
       au   au

.group e
       e    e
       ei   ei
       eu   eu

.group i
       i    i

.group o
       o    o
       oi   oi

.group u
       u    u

.group w
       w    w

//tone
.group
       // 1        32
       // 2        55
       // 3        35
       // 4        5
       // 5        22
       // 6        45
       // 7        24
       // 8        4
       1        33
       2        46
       3        52
       4        5
       5        11
       6        35
       7        41
       8        13
       |        _|
